Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.290

Pesticide application apparatuses—License plate as identification.

All licensed apparatuses shall be identified by a license plate furnished by the director, at no cost to the licensee, which plate shall be affixed in a location and manner upon such apparatus as prescribed in rule.

[ 1994 c 283 s 30; 1989 c 380 s 60; 1967 c 177 s 15; 1961 c 249 s 29.]